District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-940

Existing cooperative groups; acceptance of act; filing and recordation of amended articles and bylaws.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 490, ch. 397, § 40
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-940.
1981 Ed., § 29-1140.
1973 Ed., § 29-840.